src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns
!!! Direct
 ako+1p+Sg+Dir:ako # ;      ! 1st person singular
 kitá # ;     ! 1st person dual
 tayo # ;     ! 1st person inclusive
 kamí # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
 ikáw # ;     ! 2nd person singular
 kayó # ;     ! 2nd person plural
 siyá # ;     ! 3rd person singular
 silá # ;     ! 3rd person plural

 !!! Indirect (Genitive)
 ko # ;       ! 1st person singular
 nita # ;     ! 1st person dual
 natin # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
 namin # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
 mo # ;       ! 2nd person singular
 ninyó # ;    ! 2nd person plural
 niyá # ;     ! 3rd person singular
 nilá # ;     ! 3rd person plural

 !!! Oblique
 akin # ;     ! 1st person singular
 kanitá # ;   ! 1st person dual
 atin # ;     ! 1st person inclusive
 amin # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
 iyó # ;      ! 2nd person singular
 inyó # ;     ! 2nd person plural
 kaniyá # ;   ! 3rd person singular
 kanilá # ;   ! 3rd person plural
